vi: Kích thước hòm thư tương thích: Lớn (T3); Trung bình (T2); Quá khổ; Nhỏ (T1); Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
en: Compatible mailbox size: Large (T3); Medium (T2); Oversized; Small (T1); Standard; Other
zh-CN: 适用邮箱尺寸: 大号 (T3); 中号 (T2); 超大号; 小号 (T1); 标准; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamas pašto dėžutės dydis: Didelė (T3); Vidutinė (T2); Negabaritinė; Maža (T1); Standartinis; Kita
sv: Kompatibel brevlådestorlek: Stor (T3); Medel (T2); Extra stor; Liten (T1); Standard; Övrigt
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť poštovej schránky: Veľká (T3); Stredná (T2); Nadrozmerná; Malá (T1); Štandardná; Iné
pt-PT: Tamanho de caixa de correio compatível: Grande (T3); Média (T2); Extragrande; Pequena (T1); Padrão; Outro
pl: Zgodny rozmiar skrzynki pocztowej: Duża (T3); Średnia (T2); Ponadgabarytowa; Mała (T1); Standard; Pozostałe
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος γραμματοκιβωτίου: Μεγάλα (T3); Μεσαία (T2); Υπερμεγέθη; Μικρά (T1); Κανονικό; Άλλο
it: Dimensioni di cassetta postale compatibili: Grande (T3); Medio (T2); Sovradimensionato; Piccolo (T1); Standard; Altro
tr: Uyumlu posta kutusu boyutu: Büyük (T3); Orta (T2); Büyük boy; Küçük (T1); Standart; Diğer
nb: Kompatibel postkassestørrelse: Stor (T3); Middels (T2); Overdimensjonert; Liten (T1); Standard; Annet
fi: Yhteensopiva postilaatikon koko: Suuri (T3); Keskitaso (T2); Ylikoko; Pieni (T1); Tavallinen; Muu
ko: 호환 우편함 크기: 대형(T3); 중형(T2); 오버사이즈; 소형(T1); 표준; 기타
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на пощенската кутия: Голям (T3); Среден (Т2); Огромен; Малък (T1); Стандартно; Друго
zh-TW: 相容信箱尺寸: 大型 (T3); 中型 (T2); 超大型; 小型 (T1); 標準; 其他
ro-RO: Dimensiune a cutiei poștale compatibilă: Mare (T3); Medie (T2); Supradimensionată; Mică (T1); Standard; Altele
es: Tamaño de buzón compatible: Grande (T3); Medio (T2); De gran tamaño; Pequeño (T1); Estándar; Otros
nl: Compatibel formaat brievenbus: Groot (T3); Medium (T2); Extra groot; Klein (T1); Standaard; Overig
hu: Kompatibilis postaláda-méret: Nagy (T3); Közepes (T2); Túlméretezett; Kicsi (T1); Normál; Egyéb
de: Kompatible Briefkastengröße: Groß (T3); Mittel (T2); Übergroß; Klein (T1); Standard; Sonstiges
th: ขนาดตู้จดหมายที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ขนาดใหญ่ (T3); ขนาดกลาง (T2); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษ; ขนาดเล็ก (T1); มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
da: Kompatibel postkassestørrelse: Stor (T3); Mellem (T2); Oversized; Lille (T1); Standard; Andet
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta poštnega nabiralnika: Velik (T3); Srednje (T2); Večja velikost; Majhen (T1); Standardna; Druga
fr: Taille de boîte aux lettres compatible: Grand (T3); Moyen (T2); Surdimensionné; Petit (T1); Standard; Autre
ja: 対応郵便受けのサイズ: 大（T3）; 中（T2）; 特大; 小（T1）; スタンダード; その他
pt-BR: Tamanho de caixa de correio compatível: Grande (T3); Médio (T2); Tamanho grande; Pequeno (T1); Padrão; Outro
cs: Kompatibilní velikost schránky: Velká (T3); Střední (T2); Extra velká; Malá (T1); Standardní; Jiné
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina poštanskog sandučića: Veliki (T3); Srednji (T2); Ogroman; Mali (T1); Standardni; Ostalo
ru: Совместимый размер почтового ящика: Большой (Т3); Средний (Т2); Большой размер; Малый (Т1); Стандартный; Другой